Utah statutes.
48-1d-110.   Signing of records to be delivered for filing to division.

(1)  A record delivered to the division for filing pursuant to this chapter must be signed as follows:

(a)  Except as otherwise provided in Subsections (1)(b) and (c), a record signed by a partnership must be signed by a person authorized by the partnership.

(b)  A record filed on behalf of a dissolved partnership that has no partner must be signed by the person winding up the partnership's activities and affairs under Subsection 48-1d-902(3) or a person appointed under Subsection 48-1d-902(4) to wind up the business.

(c)  A statement of denial by a person under Section 48-1d-304 must be signed by that person.

(d)  Any other record delivered on behalf of a person to the division for filing must be signed by that person.

(2)  Any record filed under this chapter may be signed by an agent.  Whenever this chapter requires a particular individual to sign a record and the individual is deceased or incompetent, the record may be signed by a legal representative of the individual.

(3)  A person that signs a record as an agent or legal representative thereby affirms as a fact that the person is authorized to sign the record.



Enacted by Chapter 412, 2013 General Session

